California statutes. Financial Code
(B) Maintains an office in this state for the purpose of
soliciting business as an exchange facilitator.

(C) Holds himself, herself, or itself out as an exchange facilitator by advertising any of the services listed in paragraph (A) or soliciting clients in printed publications, direct mail, television or radio advertisements, telephone calls, facsimile transmissions, or other electronic communications directed to the general public in this state for purposes of providing any of those services.

(2) “Exchange facilitator” does not include any of the following:

(A) A taxpayer or a disqualified person, as that term is defined under Treasury Regulation Section 1.1031(k)-1(k), seeking to qualify for the nonrecognition provisions of Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(B) A financial
institution that is acting as a depository for exchange funds or that is acting solely as a qualified escrow holder or qualified trustee, as those terms are defined under Treasury Regulation Section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3), and that is not facilitating exchanges.

(C) A title insurance company, underwritten title company, or escrow company that is acting solely as a qualified escrow holder or qualified trustee, as those terms are defined under Treasury Regulation Section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3), and that is not facilitating exchanges.

(D) A person that advertises for and teaches seminars or classes, or otherwise makes a presentation, to attorneys, accountants, real estate professionals, tax professionals, or other professionals, when the primary purpose is to teach the professionals about tax-deferred exchanges or to train them to act as exchange facilitators.

(E) A qualified intermediary, as that term is defined under Treasury Regulation 1.1031(k)-1(g)(4), who holds exchange funds from the disposition of relinquished property located outside this state.

(F) An entity in which an exchange accommodation titleholder (EAT) has a 100 percent interest and which is used by the EAT to take title to property in this state.

(c) “Fee” means compensation of any nature, direct or indirect, monetary or in-kind, that is received by a person or related person as defined in Section 267(b) or 707(b) of the Internal Revenue Code for any services relating to or incidental to the exchange of like-kind property.

(d) “Financial institution” means a bank, credit union, savings and loan association, savings bank, or trust company
chartered under the laws of this state or the United States whose accounts are insured by the full faith and credit of the United States, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund, or other similar or successor programs.

(e) A person is “affiliated” with another specified person if the person directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with the other specified person.

(f) “Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, a joint venture, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, or any other form of a legal entity, and includes the agents and employees of that person.

(g) “Prudent investor standard” means the prudent investor rule described in Article
2.5 (commencing with Section 16045) of Chapter 1 of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Probate Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

51001.

(a) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator shall notify all existing exchange clients whose relinquished property is located in this state, or whose replacement property held under a qualified exchange accommodation agreement is located in this state, of any change in control of the exchange facilitator. That notification shall be provided within 10 business days of the effective date of the change in control by hand delivery, facsimile, electronic mail, overnight mail, or first-class mail, and shall
be posted on the exchange facilitator’s Internet Web site for at least 90 days following the change in control. The notification shall set forth the name, address, and other contact information of the transferees.

(b) For purposes of this section, “change in control” means any transfer of more than 50 percent of the assets or ownership interests, directly or indirectly, of the exchange facilitator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

51003.

(a) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator shall at all times comply with one or more of the following:

(1) Maintain a fidelity bond or bonds in an amount not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), executed by an insurer authorized to do business in this state or an
eligible surplus line insurer pursuant to Section 1765.1 of the Insurance Code.

(2) Deposit an amount of cash or securities or irrevocable letters of credit in an amount not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in an interest-bearing deposit account or a money market account with the financial institution of the person’s choice. Interest on that amount shall accrue to the exchange facilitator.

(3) Deposit all exchange funds in a qualified escrow account or qualified trust, as those terms are defined under Treasury Regulation 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3), with a financial institution and provide that any withdrawals from that escrow account or trust require that person’s and the client’s written authorization.

(b) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator may maintain a bond or bonds or deposit an amount
of cash or securities or irrevocable letters of credit in excess of the minimum required amounts.

(c) If the person engaging in business as an exchange facilitator is listed as a named insured on one or more fidelity bonds that total at least one million dollars ($1,000,000), the requirements of this section shall be deemed satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

51005.

Any person claiming to have sustained damage by reason of the failure of a person engaging in business as an exchange facilitator to comply with this division may file a claim on the bonds, deposits, or letters of credit described in Section 51003 to recover the damages subject to the terms and conditions of the bonds, deposits, or letters of credit. The amounts of the bonds, deposits, or letters of credit
shall be reduced to the extent of any payment made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 568, Sec. 5.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

51007.

(a) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator shall at all times comply with either of the following:

(1) Maintain a policy of errors and omissions insurance in an amount not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), executed by an insurer authorized to do
business in this state or an eligible surplus line insurer pursuant to Section 1765.1 of the Insurance Code.

(2) Deposit an amount of cash or securities or irrevocable letters of credit in an amount not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in an interest-bearing deposit account or a money market account with the financial institution of the person’s choice. Interest on that amount shall accrue to the exchange facilitator.

(b) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator may maintain insurance or deposit an amount of cash or securities or irrevocable letters of credit in excess of the minimum required amounts.

(c) If the person engaging in business as an exchange facilitator is listed as a named insured on an errors and omissions policy of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000), the requirements of this section shall be deemed satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 3.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

51009.

(a) A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator shall have the responsibility to act as a custodian for all exchange funds, including, but not limited to, money, property, other consideration, or instruments received by the person from, or on behalf of, a client, except funds received as the person’s compensation. A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator shall invest those exchange funds in investments that meet a prudent investor standard and that satisfy the investment goals of
liquidity and preservation of principal. For purposes of this section, a prudent investor standard is violated if any of the following occurs:

(1) Exchange funds are knowingly commingled by the exchange facilitator with the operating accounts of the exchange facilitator.

(2) Exchange funds are loaned or otherwise transferred to any person or entity, other than a financial institution, that is affiliated with or related to the exchange facilitator. This paragraph does not apply to the transfer of funds from an exchange facilitator to an exchange accommodation titleholder in accordance with an exchange contract.

(3) Exchange funds are invested in a manner that does not provide sufficient liquidity to meet the exchange facilitator’s contractual obligations to its clients and does not preserve the principal of the
exchange funds.

(b) Exchange funds shall not be subject to execution or attachment on any claim against the exchange facilitator. An exchange facilitator shall not knowingly keep, or cause to be kept, any money in any bank, credit union, or other financial institution under a name designating the money as belonging to the client of any exchange facilitator, unless that money belongs to that client and was actually entrusted to the exchange facilitator by that client.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

51011.

A person engaged in business as an exchange facilitator shall not do any of the following:

(a) Make any material misrepresentations concerning any like-kind exchange transaction that are intended to mislead.

(b) Pursue a continued or flagrant course of misrepresentation, or make false statements through advertising or otherwise.

(c) Fail, within a
reasonable time, to account for any moneys or property belonging to others that may be in the possession of, or under control of, the person.

(d) Engage in any conduct constituting fraudulent or dishonest dealings.

(e) Commit any crime involving fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, embezzlement, misappropriation of funds, robbery, or theft.

(f) Materially fail to fulfill its contractual duties to a client to deliver property or funds to the client, unless that failure is due to circumstances beyond the control of the person engaging in business as an exchange facilitator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

51013.

A person who violates this division is subject to civil suit in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 22. CALIFORNIA FINANCIAL LITERACY FUND [70000. - 70004.]

70000.

For purposes of this division, “fund” means the California Financial Literacy Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   (AB 597)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

70001.

(a) The California Financial Literacy Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. The fund shall be administered by the Controller.

(b) The purpose of the fund is to enable partnerships with the financial services community and governmental and nongovernmental stakeholders to improve Californians’ financial literacy.

(c) Funds not appropriated within 18 months of being contributed to the fund shall be returned in full to the contributor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   (AB 597)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

70002.

The Controller may accept private donations and deposit those donations into the fund, which shall be made available upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act. Donations shall not be used to promote or market the financial products of any contributor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   (AB 597)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

70003.

The Controller may convene a financial literacy advisory committee to provide additional oversight of the fund and develop strategies to improve financial literacy. If convened, the committee shall comply with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   (AB 597)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

70004.

Beginning in 2013, the Controller shall provide to the respective chairpersons of the Assembly Committee on Banking and Finance and the Senate Committee on Banking and Financial Institutions a brief annual summary on the use of the funds, when appropriated. This summary shall be submitted no later than August 30 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   (AB 597)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 23. BANK ON CALIFORNIA PROGRAM [80000. - 80001.]

80000.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that “Bank on California” is a voluntary collaborative initiative that assists Californians in opening a bank or credit union account and saving for the future.

(b) There is hereby established within the department the Bank on California Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (AB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

80001.

For purposes of this division, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(b) “Program” means the Bank on California Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 16, Sec. 5.   (SB 577)   Effective April 28, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 24. CALIFORNIA CONSUMER FINANCIAL PROTECTION LAW [90000. - 90019.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings and Purpose  [90000. - 90000.]

90000.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following: 

(1) California consumers are vulnerable to abuse if the state lacks a dedicated financial services regulator with broad authority over providers of financial products and services. The lack of such a regulator has left consumers vulnerable to abuse and forced California businesses to compete with unscrupulous providers. The financial victimization of economically vulnerable consumers, including individuals who lack a safety net, not only harms the individual but also has a broader social and economic cost on all of California, and could lead to increased caseloads for social safety net programs. These problems become even more acute in times of crisis,
 including the global Covid-19 pandemic and economic fallout. Consequently, where feasible, the Legislature should enact statutory measures to protect California residents from financial abuses in the marketplace for financial products and services.

(2) Robust consumer protections enable wealth building and promote a vibrant economy. They are especially important among various populations, including, but not limited to, military service members, seniors, students, and new Californians. Unfair, deceptive, or abusive practices in the provision of financial products and services undermine the public confidence that is essential to the continued functioning of the financial system and sound extensions of credit to consumers.

(3) Technological innovation offers great promise to the more effective and efficient provision of consumer financial products and services to the population of
 California and also poses risks to consumers and challenges to law enforcement in addressing those risks.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact the California Consumer Financial Protection Law to strengthen consumer protections by expanding the ability of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation to improve accountability and transparency in the California financial system, provide consumer financial education, and protect consumers from abusive financial practices, while prioritizing the prevention of unethical businesses from harming the most vulnerable populations including military service members, seniors, students, low- and moderate-income individuals, and new Californians.

(b) The purpose of the California Consumer Financial Protection Law shall be to promote consumer welfare, fair competition, and wealth creation in this state by doing all of the
 following:

(1) Promoting nondiscriminatory access to responsible, affordable credit on terms that reasonably reflect consumers’ ability to repay.

(2) Promoting nondiscriminatory access to consumer financial products and services that are understandable and not unfair, deceptive, or abusive.

(3) Protecting consumers from discrimination and unfair, deceptive, and abusive acts and practices in connection with financial practices and services.

(4) Promoting nondiscriminatory consumer-protective innovation in consumer financial products and services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Short Title  [90001. - 90001.]

90001.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the “California Consumer Financial Protection Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Exemptions [90002. - 90002.]

90002.

(a) This division shall not apply to a licensee, or an employee of a licensee, of any state agency other than the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation to the extent that licensee or employee is acting under the authority of the other state agency’s license.

(b) (1) Except as provided by paragraph (2), this division shall not apply to a person or employee of that person to the extent that person or employee is acting under the authority of one of the following licenses, certificates, or charters issued by the Department of Financial
 Protection and Innovation:

(A) Any person licensed as an escrow agent under Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Financial Code.

(B) Any person licensed as a finance lender, broker, program administrator, or mortgage loan originator under Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code.

(C) Any person licensed as a broker-dealer or investment adviser under Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 the Corporations Code.

(D) Any person licensed as a residential mortgage lender, a mortgage servicer, or a mortgage loan originator under Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code.

(E) Any person licensed as a check seller, bill payer, or prorater under Division 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of the Financial Code.

(F) Any person licensed as a capital access company under Division 3 (commencing with Section 28000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.

(G) Any person doing business under a license, charter, or certificate issued under the Financial Institutions Law, including Division 1 (commencing with Section 99), Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000), Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 2000), Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800), Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000), Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000), Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000), and Division 15 (commencing with Section 31000) of the Financial Code.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to prevent the commissioner from using the authority provided by this division to enforce Section 90003.

(c) This division shall not apply to a bank, bank holding company, trust company, savings and loan association,
 savings and loan holding company, credit union, or an organization subject to oversight of the Farm Credit Administration, when acting under the authority of a license, certificate, or charter under federal law or the laws of another state.

(d) This division applies to all other covered persons, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 90005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 355, Sec. 1.   (SB 825)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Prohibited Acts [90003. - 90004.]

90003.

(a) It is unlawful for a covered person or service provider, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 90005, to do any of the following:

(1) Engage, have engaged, or propose to engage in any unlawful, unfair, deceptive, or abusive act or practice with respect to consumer financial products or services.

(2) Offer or provide to a consumer any financial product or service not in conformity with any consumer financial law or otherwise commit any act or omission in violation of a consumer financial law.

(3) Fail or refuse, as required by a consumer financial law or any rule or order issued by the department
 thereunder, to do any of the following:

(A) Permit the department access to or copying of records.

(B) Establish or maintain records.

(C) Make reports or provide information to the department.

(b) For any person who knowingly or recklessly provides substantial assistance to a covered person or service provider in violation of subdivision (a) or any rule or order issued thereunder, the provider of that substantial assistance shall be deemed to be in violation of that section to the same extent as the person to whom that assistance is provided.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person shall not be held to have violated paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) solely by virtue of providing or
 selling time or space to a covered person or service provider placing an advertisement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

90004.

(a) In addition to the prohibitions contained in Section 1102.5 of the Labor Code, a covered person or service provider shall not terminate or in any other way discriminate against, or cause to be terminated or discriminated against, any covered employee or any authorized representative of covered employees by reason of the fact that the employee or representative, whether at the initiative of the employee or in the ordinary course of the duties of the employee, or any person acting pursuant to a request of the employee, has either:

(1) Filed or instituted, or caused to be filed or instituted, any proceeding under any consumer financial law.

(2) Objected to, or refused to
 participate in, any activity, policy, practice, or assigned task that the employee or other such person reasonably believed to be in violation of any law, rule, order, standard, or prohibition, subject to the jurisdiction of, or enforceable by, the department.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the term “covered employee” means any individual performing tasks related to the offering or provision of a consumer financial product or service.

(c) (1) A person who believes that they have been terminated or otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of subdivision (a) shall have all remedies available under Section 1102.5 of the Labor Code, subject to the restrictions set forth in that section and the implementing regulations.

(2) This subdivision does not restrict the remedies
 available under this law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Definitions [90005. - 90005.]

90005.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this division, except as otherwise provided in this division or if the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(a) “Affiliate” means any person that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person. For purposes of this definition, “control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(c) “Consumer” means an individual or an agent, trustee, or representative acting on behalf of an individual or the
 estate, trust, or joint trust of an individual, however denominated.

(d) “Consumer financial law” means a federal or California law that directly and specifically regulates the manner, content, or terms and conditions of any financial transaction, or any account, product, or service related thereto, with respect to a consumer.

(e) “Consumer financial product or service” means either of the following:

(1) A financial product or service that is delivered, offered, or provided for use by consumers primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(2) A financial product or service as described in paragraph (11) of subdivision (k).

(f) “Covered person” means, to the extent not preempted
 by federal law, any of the following:

(1) Any person that engages in offering or providing a consumer financial product or service to a resident of this state.

(2) Any affiliate of a person described in this subdivision if the affiliate acts as a service provider to the person.

(3) Any service provider to the extent that the person engages in the offering or provision of its own consumer financial product or service.

(g) “Credit” means the right granted by a person to another person to defer payment of a debt, incur debt and defer its payment, or purchase property or services and defer payment for those purchases.

(h) “Debt” means any obligation of a person to pay another person money
 regardless of whether the obligation is absolute or contingent, has been reduced to judgment, is fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, secured, or unsecured and includes any obligation that gives rise to right of an equitable remedy for breach of performance if the breach gives rise to a right to payment.

(i) “Deposit-taking activity” means any of the following:

(1) The acceptance of deposits, maintenance of deposit accounts, or the provision of services related to the acceptance of deposits or the maintenance of deposit accounts.

(2) The acceptance of funds, the provision of other services related to the acceptance of funds, or the maintenance of member share accounts by a credit union.

(3) The receipt of funds or the equivalent
 thereof, as the department may determine by rule or order, received or held by a covered person or an agent for a covered person for the purpose of facilitating a payment or transferring funds or value of funds between a consumer and a third party.

(j) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(k) “Financial product or service” means:

(1) Extending credit and servicing extensions of credit, including acquiring, purchasing, selling, brokering extensions of credit, other than solely extending commercial credit to a person who originates consumer credit transactions.

(2) Extending or brokering leases of personal or real property that are the functional equivalent of purchase finance arrangements, if all of the
 following:

(A) The lease is on a nonoperating basis.

(B) The initial term of the lease is at least 90 days.

(C) In the case of a lease involving real property, at the inception of the initial lease, the transaction is intended to result in ownership of the leased property to be transferred to the lessee, subject to standards prescribed by the department.

(3) Providing real estate settlement services.

(4) Engaging in deposit-taking activities, transmitting or exchanging funds, or otherwise acting as a custodian of funds or any financial instrument for use by or on behalf of a consumer.

(5) Selling, providing, or issuing stored
 value or payment instruments, except that, in the case of a sale of, or transaction to reload, stored value, only if the seller exercises substantial control over the terms or conditions of the stored value provided to the consumer where, for purposes of this paragraph, both:

(A) A seller shall not be found to exercise substantial control over the terms or conditions of the stored value if the seller is not a party to the contract with the consumer for the stored value product, and another person is principally responsible for establishing the terms or conditions of the stored value.

(B) Advertising the nonfinancial goods or services of the seller on the stored value card or device is not in itself an exercise of substantial control over the terms or conditions.

(6) Providing check cashing, check collection, or check
 guaranty services.

(7) Providing payments or other financial data processing products or services to a consumer by any technological means, including processing or storing financial or banking data for any payment instrument, or through any payment system or networks used for processing payment data, including payments made through an online banking system or mobile telecommunications network, except that a person shall not be deemed to be a covered person with respect to financial data processing solely because the person either:

(A) Is a merchant, retailer, or seller of any nonfinancial good or service who engages in financial data processing by transmitting or storing payment data about a consumer exclusively for purpose of initiating payment instructions by the consumer to pay that person for the purchase of, or to complete a commercial transaction for, the nonfinancial good
 or service sold directly by that person to the consumer.

(B) Provides access to a host server to a person for purposes of enabling that person to establish and maintain a website.

(8) Providing financial advisory services other than services relating to securities provided by a person regulated by the Securities Exchange Commission or a person regulated by a state securities commission, but only to the extent that such person acts in a regulated capacity, to consumers on individual financial matters or relating to proprietary financial products or services (other than by publishing any bona fide newspaper, news magazine, or business or financial publication of general and regular circulation, including publishing market data, news, or data analytics or investment information or recommendations that are not tailored to the individual needs of a particular consumer) including both
 of the following:

(A) Providing credit counseling to any consumer.

(B) Providing services to assist a consumer with debt management or debt settlement, modifying the terms of any extension of credit, or avoiding foreclosure.

(9) Collecting, analyzing, maintaining, or providing consumer report information or other account information, including information relating to the credit history of consumers, used or expected to be used in connection with any decision regarding the offering or provision of a consumer financial product or service, except to the extent that:

(A) A person does any of the following:

(i) Collects, analyzes, or maintains information that relates solely to the transactions
 between a consumer and that person.

(ii) Provides information to an affiliate of the person, as described in subdivision (a).

(iii) Provides information that is used or expected to be used solely in any decision regarding the offering or provision of a product or service that is not a consumer financial product or service.

(B) The information described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) is not used by the person or affiliate in connection with any decision regarding the offering or provision of a consumer financial product or service to the consumer, other than credit described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 90006.

(10) Collecting debt related to any consumer financial product or service.

(11) Directly or indirectly brokering the offer or sale of a franchise in this state on behalf of another.

(12) Offering another financial product or service as may be defined by the department, by regulation, for purposes of this division, if the department finds that the financial product or service is either:

(A) Entered into or conducted as a subterfuge or with a purpose to evade any consumer financial law.

(B) Permissible for a bank or for a financial holding company to offer or to provide under any provision of law or regulation applicable to a bank or a financial holding company, and has, or likely will have, a material impact on consumers, excluding, however, solely from the department’s authority to define additional financial products and
 services under this subparagraph and not the exercise of any other authority it may have, the following activities provided to a covered person:

(i) Providing information products or services to a covered person for identity authentication.

(ii) Providing information products or services for fraud or identify theft detection, prevention, or investigation.

(iii) Providing document retrieval or delivery services.

(iv) Providing public records information retrieval.

(v) Providing information products or services for anti-money laundering activities.

(13) The term “financial product or service” does not include either of the
 following:

(A) Insurance, as defined in Section 22 of the Insurance Code, regulated by the Department of Insurance.

(B) The provision, by a person, of electronic data transmission, routing, intermediate or transient storage, or connections to a telecommunications system or network, not including a person that provides those electronic conduit services if, when providing those services, the person does any of the following:

(i) Selects or modifies the content of the electronic data.

(ii) Transmits, routes, stores, or provides connections for electronic data, including financial data, in a manner that the financial data is differentiated from other types of data of the same form that the person transmits, routes, or stores, or with respect to which,
 provides connections.

(iii) Is a payee, payor, correspondent, or similar party to a payment transaction with a consumer.

(l) “Payment instrument” means a check, draft, warrant, money order, traveler’s check, electronic instrument, or other instrument, payment of funds, or monetary value, other than currency.

(m) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, proprietorship, syndicate, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, public corporation or joint stock company, or any other organization or legal or commercial entity.

(n) (1) “Service provider” means any person that provides a material service to a covered
 person in connection with the offering or provision by that covered person of a consumer financial product or service, including a person that either:

(A) Participates in designing, operating, or maintaining the consumer financial product or service.

(B) Processes transactions relating to the consumer financial product or service, other than unknowingly or incidentally transmitting or processing financial data in a manner that the data is undifferentiated from other types of data of the same form as the person transmits or processes.

(2) The term “service provider” does not include a person solely by virtue of that person offering or providing to a covered person either:

(A) A support service of a type provided to businesses generally or a similar
 ministerial service.

(B) Time or space for an advertisement for a consumer financial product or service through print, newspaper, or electronic media.

(o) (1) “Stored value” means funds or monetary value represented in any electronic format, whether or not specially encrypted, and stored or capable of storage on electronic media in such a way as to be retrievable and transferred electronically, and includes a prepaid debit card or product, or any other similar product, regardless of whether the amount of the funds or monetary value may be increased or reloaded.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the term “stored value” does not include a special purpose card or certificate, which shall be defined for purposes of this paragraph as funds or monetary value represented in any electronic format,
 whether or not specially encrypted, that is all of the following:

(A) Issued by a merchant, retailer, or other seller of nonfinancial goods or services.

(B) Redeemable only for transactions with the merchant, retailer, or seller of nonfinancial goods or services or with an affiliate of such person, which affiliate itself is a merchant, retailer, or seller of nonfinancial goods or services.

(C) Issued in a specified amount that, except in the case of a card or product used solely for telephone services, may not be increased or reloaded.

(D) Purchased on a prepaid basis in exchange for payment.

(E) Honored upon presentation to the merchant, retailer, or seller of nonfinancial goods or
 services or an affiliate of such person, which affiliate itself is a merchant, retailer, or seller of nonfinancial goods or services, only for any nonfinancial goods or services

(p) These definitions shall be interpreted consistently with the definitions in the Consumer Financial Protection Act of 2010 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 5481). Any inconsistency or ambiguity shall be resolved in favor of greater protections to the consumer and more expansive coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Administration [90006. - 90009.5.]

90006.

(a) The department shall regulate the offering and provision of consumer financial products or services under California consumer financial laws and shall exercise nonexclusive oversight and enforcement authority under California consumer financial laws. To the extent permissible under the federal consumer financial laws, the department shall exercise nonexclusive oversight and enforcement under the federal consumer financial laws.

(b) In addition to existing functions, powers, and duties, the department shall have all of the following functions, powers, and duties in carrying out its responsibilities under this law:

(1) To bring administrative and civil actions, and to
 prosecute those civil actions before state and federal courts.

(2) To hold hearings and issue publications, results of inquiries and research, and reports that may aid in effectuating the purposes of this law.

(3) To perform such other functions as may be authorized or required by law.

(c) Sections 11040 and 11042 of the Government Code do not apply to this law.

(d) (1) The department shall establish the Financial Technology Innovation Office.

(2) The commissioner may investigate, research, analyze, and report on markets for consumer financial products or services.

(3) The commissioner may develop and